Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-208.03
School of barbering; services; performed by regularly enrolled students.

All barbering services performed in a barber school shall be entirely performed by regularly enrolled students.

Laws 1963, c. 409, § 12, p. 1320.